Nebraska, session 109, LB208.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 77-2708, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-2708 (1)(a) The sales and use taxes imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967 shall be due and payable to the Tax Commissioner monthly on or before
the twentieth day of the month next succeeding each monthly period unless
otherwise provided pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.
(b)(i) On or before the twentieth day of the month following each monthly
period or such other period as the Tax Commissioner may require, a return for
such period, along with all taxes due, shall be filed with the Tax Commissioner
in such form and content as the Tax Commissioner may prescribe and containing
such information as the Tax Commissioner deems necessary for the proper
administration of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. The Tax Commissioner, if he
or she deems it necessary in order to insure payment to or facilitate the
collection by the state of the amount of sales or use taxes due, may require
returns and payment of the amount of such taxes for periods other than monthly
periods in the case of a particular seller, retailer, or purchaser, as the case
may be. The Tax Commissioner shall by rule and regulation require reports and
tax payments from sellers, retailers, or purchasers depending on their yearly
tax liability. Except as required by the streamlined sales and use tax
agreement, annual returns shall be required if such sellers', retailers', or
purchasers' yearly tax liability is less than nine hundred dollars, quarterly
returns shall be required if their yearly tax liability is nine hundred dollars
or more and less than three thousand dollars, and monthly returns shall be
required if their yearly tax liability is three thousand dollars or more. The
Tax Commissioner shall have the discretion to allow an annual return for
seasonal retailers, even when their yearly tax liability exceeds the amounts
listed in this subdivision.
The Tax Commissioner may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
allow annual, semiannual, or quarterly returns for any retailer making monthly
remittances or payments of sales and use taxes by electronic funds transfer or
for any retailer remitting tax to the state pursuant to the streamlined sales
and use tax agreement. Such rules and regulations may establish a method of
determining the amount of the payment that will result in substantially all of
the tax liability being paid each quarter. At least once each year, the
difference between the amount paid and the amount due shall be reconciled. If
the difference is more than ten percent of the amount paid, a penalty of fifty
percent of the unpaid amount shall be imposed.
(ii) For purposes of the sales tax, a return shall be filed by every
retailer liable for collection from a purchaser and payment to the state of the
tax, except that a combined sales tax return may be filed for all licensed
locations which are subject to common ownership. For purposes of this
subdivision, common ownership means the same person or persons own eighty
percent or more of each licensed location. For purposes of the use tax, a
return shall be filed by every retailer engaged in business in this state and
by every person who has purchased property, the storage, use, or other
consumption of which is subject to the use tax, but who has not paid the use
tax due to a retailer required to collect the tax.
(iii) The Tax Commissioner may require that returns be signed by the
person required to file the return or by his or her duly authorized agent but
need not be verified by oath.
(iv) A taxpayer who keeps his or her regular books and records on a cash
basis, an accrual basis, or any generally recognized accounting basis which
correctly reflects the operation of the business may file the sales and use tax
returns required by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 on the same accounting
basis that is used for the regular books and records, except that on credit,
conditional, and installment sales, the retailer who keeps his or her books on
an accrual basis may report such sales on the cash basis and pay the tax upon
the collections made during each month. If a taxpayer transfers, sells,
assigns, or otherwise disposes of an account receivable, he or she shall be
deemed to have received the full balance of the consideration for the original
sale and shall be liable for the remittance of the sales tax on the balance of
the total sale price not previously reported, except that such transfer, sale,
-1-

LB208 LB208
2025 2025
assignment, or other disposition of an account receivable by a retailer to a
subsidiary shall not be deemed to require the retailer to pay the sales tax on
the credit sale represented by the account transferred prior to the time the
customer makes payment on such account. If the subsidiary does not obtain a
Nebraska sales tax permit, the taxpayer shall obtain a surety bond in favor of
the State of Nebraska to insure payment of the tax and any interest and penalty
imposed thereon under this section in an amount not less than two times the
amount of tax payable on outstanding accounts receivable held by the subsidiary
as of the end of the prior calendar year. Failure to obtain either a sales tax
permit or a surety bond in accordance with this section shall result in the
payment on the next required filing date of all sales taxes not previously
remitted. When the retailer has adopted one basis or the other of reporting
credit, conditional, or installment sales and paying the tax thereon, he or she
will not be permitted to change from that basis without first having notified
the Tax Commissioner.
(c) Except as provided in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, the
taxpayer required to file the return shall deliver or mail any required return
together with a remittance of the net amount of the tax due to the office of
the Tax Commissioner on or before the required filing date. Failure to file the
return, filing after the required filing date, failure to remit the net amount
of the tax due, or remitting the net amount of the tax due after the required
filing date shall be cause for a penalty, in addition to interest, of ten
percent of the amount of tax not paid by the required filing date or twenty-
five dollars, whichever is greater, unless the penalty is being collected under
subdivision (1)(i), (1)(j)(i), or (1)(k)(i) of section 77-2703 by a county
treasurer or the Department of Motor Vehicles, in which case the penalty shall
be five dollars.
(d) The taxpayer shall deduct and withhold, from the taxes otherwise due
from him or her on his or her tax return, three percent of the first five
thousand dollars remitted each month to reimburse himself or herself for the
cost of collecting the tax. Taxpayers filing a combined return as allowed by
subdivision (1)(b)(ii) of this subsection shall compute such collection fees on
the basis of the receipts and liability of each licensed location. If a model 1
seller's sales and use tax functions are performed by a certified service
provider and the certified service provider is compensated pursuant to the
streamlined sales and use tax agreement for performing such functions, then the
model 1 seller shall not receive any collection fees under this subdivision.
(e) A retailer that makes sales into Nebraska using a multivendor
marketplace platform is relieved of its obligation to collect and remit sales
taxes to Nebraska with regard to any sales taxes collected and remitted by the
multivendor marketplace platform. Such a retailer must include all sales into
Nebraska in its gross receipts in its return, but may claim credit for any
sales taxes collected and remitted by the multivendor marketplace platform with
respect to such retailer's sales. Such retailer is liable for the sales tax due
on sales into Nebraska as provided in section 77-2704.35.
(f) A multivendor marketplace platform is relieved of its obligation to
collect and remit the correct amount of state and local sales taxes to Nebraska
to the extent that the multivendor marketplace platform can establish that the
error was due to insufficient or incorrect information given to the multivendor
marketplace platform by the seller and relied on by the multivendor marketplace
platform. This subdivision shall not apply if the multivendor marketplace
platform and the seller are related persons under either section 267(b) or (c)
or section 707(b) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 or if the seller is also
the multivendor marketplace platform operator.
(2)(a) If the Tax Commissioner determines that any sales or use tax
amount, penalty, or interest has been paid more than once, has been erroneously
or illegally collected or computed, or has been paid and the purchaser
qualifies for a refund under section 77-2708.01, the Tax Commissioner shall set
forth that fact in his or her records and the excess amount collected or paid
may be credited on any sales, use, or income tax amounts then due and payable
from the person under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967. Any balance may be
refunded to the person by whom it was paid or his or her successors,
administrators, or executors.
(b) No refund shall be allowed unless a claim therefor is filed with the
Tax Commissioner by the person who made the overpayment or his or her attorney,
executor, or administrator within three years from the required filing date
following the close of the period for which the overpayment was made, within
six months after any determination becomes final under section 77-2709, or
within six months from the date of overpayment with respect to such
determinations, whichever of these three periods expires later, unless the
credit relates to a period for which a waiver has been given. Failure to file a
claim within the time prescribed in this subsection shall constitute a waiver
of any demand against the state on account of overpayment.
(c) Every claim shall be in writing on forms prescribed by the Tax
Commissioner and shall state the specific amount and grounds upon which the
claim is founded. No refund shall be made in any amount less than two dollars.
(d) The Tax Commissioner shall allow or disallow a claim within one
hundred eighty days after it has been filed. A request for a hearing shall
constitute a waiver of the one-hundred-eighty-day period. The claimant and the
Tax Commissioner may also agree to extend the one-hundred-eighty-day period. If
a hearing has not been requested and the Tax Commissioner has neither allowed
nor disallowed a claim within either the one hundred eighty days or the period
agreed to by the claimant and the Tax Commissioner, the claim shall be deemed
-2-

LB208 LB208
2025 2025
to have been allowed.
(e) Within thirty days after disallowing any claim in whole or in part,
the Tax Commissioner shall serve notice of his or her action on the claimant in
the manner prescribed for service of notice of a deficiency determination.
(f) Within thirty days after the mailing of the notice of the Tax
Commissioner's action upon a claim filed pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967, the action of the Tax Commissioner shall be final unless the taxpayer
seeks review of the Tax Commissioner's determination as provided in section
77-27,127.
(g) Upon the allowance of a credit or refund of any sum erroneously or
illegally assessed or collected, of any penalty collected without authority, or
of any sum which was excessive or in any manner wrongfully collected, interest
shall be allowed and paid on the amount of such credit or refund at the rate
specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be adjusted,
from the date such sum was paid or from the date the return was required to be
filed, whichever date is later, to the date of the allowance of the refund or,
in the case of a credit, to the due date of the amount against which the credit
is allowed, but in the case of a voluntary and unrequested payment in excess of
actual tax liability or a refund under section 77-2708.01, no interest shall be
allowed when such excess is refunded or credited.
(h) No suit or proceeding shall be maintained in any court for the
recovery of any amount alleged to have been erroneously or illegally determined
or collected unless a claim for refund or credit has been duly filed.
(i) The Tax Commissioner may recover any refund or part thereof which is
erroneously made and any credit or part thereof which is erroneously allowed by
issuing a deficiency determination within one year from the date of refund or
credit or within the period otherwise allowed for issuing a deficiency
determination, whichever expires later.
(j)(i) Credit shall be allowed to the retailer, contractor, or
repairperson for sales or use taxes paid pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967 on any deduction taken that is attributed to bad debts not including
interest. Bad debt has the same meaning as in 26 U.S.C. 166, as such section
existed on January 1, 2003. However, the amount calculated pursuant to 26
U.S.C. 166 shall be adjusted to exclude: Financing charges or interest; sales
or use taxes charged on the purchase price; uncollectible amounts on property
that remains in the possession of the seller until the full purchase price is
paid; and expenses incurred in attempting to collect any debt and repossessed
property.
(ii) Bad debts may be deducted on the return for the period during which
the bad debt is written off as uncollectible in the claimant's books and
records and is eligible to be deducted for federal income tax purposes. A
claimant who is not required to file federal income tax returns may deduct a
bad debt on a return filed for the period in which the bad debt is written off
as uncollectible in the claimant's books and records and would be eligible for
a bad debt deduction for federal income tax purposes if the claimant was
required to file a federal income tax return.
(iii) If a deduction is taken for a bad debt and the debt is subsequently
collected in whole or in part, the tax on the amount so collected must be paid
and reported on the return filed for the period in which the collection is
made.
(iv) When the amount of bad debt exceeds the amount of taxable sales for
the period during which the bad debt is written off, a refund claim may be
filed within the otherwise applicable statute of limitations for refund claims.
The statute of limitations shall be measured from the due date of the return on
which the bad debt could first be claimed.
(v) If filing responsibilities have been assumed by a certified service
provider, the service provider may claim, on behalf of the retailer, any bad
debt allowance provided by this section. The certified service provider shall
credit or refund the full amount of any bad debt allowance or refund received
to the retailer.
(vi) For purposes of reporting a payment received on a previously claimed
bad debt, any payments made on a debt or account are applied first
proportionally to the taxable price of the property or service and the sales
tax thereon, and secondly to interest, service charges, and any other charges.
(vii) In situations in which the books and records of the party claiming
the bad debt allowance support an allocation of the bad debts among the member
states in the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, the state shall permit
the allocation.
(3) Beginning July 1, 2020, if a refund claim under this section involves
a refund of a tax imposed under the Local Option Revenue Act or section 13-319,
13-2813, or 77-6403 and the amount of such tax to be refunded is at least five
thousand dollars, the Tax Commissioner shall notify the affected city, village,
county, or municipal county of such claim within twenty days after receiving
the claim. If the Tax Commissioner allows the claim and the refund of such tax
is at least five thousand dollars, the Tax Commissioner shall notify the
affected city, village, county, or municipal county of such refund and shall
give the city, village, county, or municipal county the option of having such
refund deducted from its tax proceeds in one lump sum or in twelve equal
monthly installments. The city, village, county, or municipal county shall make
its selection and shall certify the selection to the Tax Commissioner within
twenty days after receiving notice of the refund. The Tax Commissioner shall
then deduct such refund from the applicable tax proceeds in accordance with the
selection when he or she deducts refunds pursuant to section 13-324, 13-2814,
-3-

LB208 LB208
2025 2025
or 77-6403 or subsection (1) of section 77-27,144, whichever is applicable.
This subsection shall not apply to any refund that is subject to subdivision
(2)(a) or (2)(b)(ii) or subsection (3) or (4) of section 77-27,144.
Sec. 2. Section 77-2711, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-2711 (1)(a) The Tax Commissioner shall enforce sections 77-2701.04 to
77-2713 and may prescribe, adopt, and enforce rules and regulations relating to
the administration and enforcement of such sections.
(b) The Tax Commissioner may prescribe the extent to which any ruling or
regulation shall be applied without retroactive effect.
(2) The Tax Commissioner may employ accountants, auditors, investigators,
assistants, and clerks necessary for the efficient administration of the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 and may delegate authority to his or her
representatives to conduct hearings, prescribe regulations, or perform any
other duties imposed by such act.
(3)(a) Every seller, every retailer, and every person storing, using, or
otherwise consuming in this state property purchased from a retailer shall keep
such records, receipts, invoices, and other pertinent papers in such form as
the Tax Commissioner may reasonably require.
(b) Every such seller, retailer, or person shall keep such records for not
less than three years from the making of such records unless the Tax
Commissioner in writing sooner authorized their destruction.
(4) The Tax Commissioner or any person authorized in writing by him or her
may examine the books, papers, records, and equipment of any person selling
property and any person liable for the use tax and may investigate the
character of the business of the person in order to verify the accuracy of any
return made or, if no return is made by the person, to ascertain and determine
the amount required to be paid. In the examination of any person selling
property or of any person liable for the use tax, an inquiry shall be made as
to the accuracy of the reporting of city and county sales and use taxes for
which the person is liable under the Local Option Revenue Act or sections
13-319, 13-324, 13-2813, and 77-6403 and the accuracy of the allocation made
between the various counties, cities, villages, and municipal counties of the
tax due. The Tax Commissioner may make or cause to be made copies of resale or
exemption certificates and may pay a reasonable amount to the person having
custody of the records for providing such copies.
(5) The taxpayer shall have the right to keep or store his or her records
at a point outside this state and shall make his or her records available to
the Tax Commissioner at all times.
(6) In administration of the use tax, the Tax Commissioner may require the
filing of reports by any person or class of persons having in his, her, or
their possession or custody information relating to sales of property, the
storage, use, or other consumption of which is subject to the tax. The report
shall be filed when the Tax Commissioner requires and shall set forth the names
and addresses of purchasers of the property, the sales price of the property,
the date of sale, and such other information as the Tax Commissioner may
require.
(7) It shall be a Class I misdemeanor for the Tax Commissioner, or any
official or employee of the Tax Commissioner, the State Treasurer, or the
Department of Administrative Services, or any other person to make known in any
manner whatever the business affairs, operations, or information obtained by an
investigation of records and activities of any retailer or any other person
visited or examined in the discharge of official duty or the amount or source
of income, profits, losses, expenditures, or any particular thereof, set forth
or disclosed in any return, or to permit any return or copy thereof, or any
book containing any abstract or particulars thereof to be seen or examined by
any person not connected with the Tax Commissioner. Nothing in this section
shall be construed to prohibit (a) the delivery to a taxpayer, his or her duly
authorized representative, or his or her successors, receivers, trustees,
executors, administrators, assignees, or guarantors, if directly interested, of
a certified copy of any return or report in connection with his or her tax, (b)
the publication of statistics so classified as to prevent the identification of
particular reports or returns and the items thereof, (c) the inspection by the
Attorney General, other legal representative of the state, or county attorney
of the reports or returns of any taxpayer when either (i) information on the
reports or returns is considered by the Attorney General to be relevant to any
action or proceeding instituted by the taxpayer or against whom an action or
proceeding is being considered or has been commenced by any state agency or the
county or (ii) the taxpayer has instituted an action to review the tax based
thereon or an action or proceeding against the taxpayer for collection of tax
or failure to comply with the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 is being considered
or has been commenced, (d) the furnishing of any information to the United
States Government or to states allowing similar privileges to the Tax
Commissioner, (e) the disclosure of information and records to a collection
agency contracting with the Tax Commissioner pursuant to sections 77-377.01 to
77-377.04, (f) the disclosure to another party to a transaction of information
and records concerning the transaction between the taxpayer and the other
party, (g) the disclosure of information pursuant to section 77-27,195,
77-5731, 77-6837, 77-6839, or 77-6928, or (h) the disclosure of information to
the Department of Labor necessary for the administration of the Employment
Security Law, the Contractor Registration Act, or the Employee Classification
Act.
(8) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
-4-

LB208 LB208
2025 2025
Tax Commissioner may permit the Postal Inspector of the United States Postal
Service or his or her delegates to inspect the reports or returns of any person
filed pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 when information on the
reports or returns is relevant to any action or proceeding instituted or being
considered by the United States Postal Service against such person for the
fraudulent use of the mails to carry and deliver false and fraudulent tax
returns to the Tax Commissioner with the intent to defraud the State of
Nebraska or to evade the payment of Nebraska state taxes.
(9) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner may permit other tax officials of this state to inspect the
tax returns, reports, and applications filed under sections 77-2701.04 to
77-2713, but such inspection shall be permitted only for purposes of enforcing
a tax law and only to the extent and under the conditions prescribed by the
rules and regulations of the Tax Commissioner.
(10) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner may, upon request, provide the county board of any county
which has exercised the authority granted by section 81-3716 with a list of the
names and addresses of the hotels located within the county for which lodging
sales tax returns have been filed or for which lodging sales taxes have been
remitted for the county's County Visitors Promotion Fund under the Nebraska
Visitors Development Act.
The information provided by the Tax Commissioner shall indicate only the
names and addresses of the hotels located within the requesting county for
which lodging sales tax returns have been filed for a specified period and the
fact that lodging sales taxes remitted by or on behalf of the hotel have
constituted a portion of the total sum remitted by the state to the county for
a specified period under the provisions of the Nebraska Visitors Development
Act. No additional information shall be revealed.
(11)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section,
the Tax Commissioner shall, upon written request by the Auditor of Public
Accounts or the office of Legislative Audit, make tax returns and tax return
information open to inspection by or disclosure to the Auditor of Public
Accounts or employees of the office of Legislative Audit for the purpose of and
to the extent necessary in making an audit of the Department of Revenue
pursuant to section 50-1205 or 84-304. Confidential tax returns and tax return
information shall be audited only upon the premises of the Department of
Revenue. All audit work papers pertaining to the audit of the Department of
Revenue shall be stored in a secure place in the Department of Revenue.
(b) No employee of the Auditor of Public Accounts or the office of
Legislative Audit shall disclose to any person, other than another Auditor of
Public Accounts or office employee whose official duties require such
disclosure, any return or return information described in the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 in a form which can be associated with or otherwise identify,
directly or indirectly, a particular taxpayer.
(c) Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be
guilty of a Class I misdemeanor. For purposes of this subsection, employee
includes a former Auditor of Public Accounts or office of Legislative Audit
employee.
(12) For purposes of this subsection and subsections (11) and (14) of this
section:
(a) Disclosure means the making known to any person in any manner a tax
return or return information;
(b) Return information means:
(i) A taxpayer's identification number and (A) the nature, source, or
amount of his or her income, payments, receipts, deductions, exemptions,
credits, assets, liabilities, net worth, tax liability, tax withheld,
deficiencies, over assessments, or tax payments, whether the taxpayer's return
was, is being, or will be examined or subject to other investigation or
processing or (B) any other data received by, recorded by, prepared by,
furnished to, or collected by the Tax Commissioner with respect to a return or
the determination of the existence or possible existence of liability or the
amount of liability of any person for any tax, penalty, interest, fine,
forfeiture, or other imposition or offense; and
(ii) Any part of any written determination or any background file document
relating to such written determination; and
(c) Tax return or return means any tax or information return or claim for
refund required by, provided for, or permitted under sections 77-2701 to
77-2713 which is filed with the Tax Commissioner by, on behalf of, or with
respect to any person and any amendment or supplement thereto, including
supporting schedules, attachments, or lists which are supplemental to or part
of the filed return.
(13) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section, the
Tax Commissioner shall, upon request, provide any municipality which has
adopted the local option sales tax under the Local Option Revenue Act with a
list of the names and addresses of the retailers which have collected the local
option sales tax for the municipality. The request may be made annually and
shall be submitted to the Tax Commissioner on or before June 30 of each year.
The information provided by the Tax Commissioner shall indicate only the names
and addresses of the retailers. The Tax Commissioner may provide additional
information to a municipality so long as the information does not include any
data detailing the specific revenue, expenses, or operations of any particular
business.
(14)(a) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (7) of this section,
-5-

LB208 LB208
2025 2025
the Tax Commissioner shall, upon written request, provide an individual
certified under subdivision (b) of this subsection representing a municipality
which has adopted the local option sales and use tax under the Local Option
Revenue Act with confidential sales and use tax returns and sales and use tax
return information regarding taxpayers that possess a sales tax permit and the
amounts remitted by such permitholders at locations within the boundaries of
the requesting municipality or with confidential business use tax returns and
business use tax return information regarding taxpayers that file a Nebraska
and Local Business Use Tax Return and the amounts remitted by such taxpayers at
locations within the boundaries of the requesting municipality. Any written
request pursuant to this subsection shall provide the Department of Revenue
with no less than ten business days to prepare the sales and use tax returns
and sales and use tax return information requested. The individual certified
under subdivision (b) of this subsection shall review such returns and return
information only upon the premises of the department, except that such
limitation shall not apply if the certifying municipality has an agreement in
effect under the Nebraska Advantage Transformational Tourism and Redevelopment
Act. In such case, the individual certified under subdivision (b) of this
subsection may request that copies of such returns and return information be
sent to him or her by electronic transmission, secured in a manner as
determined by the Tax Commissioner.
(b) Each municipality that seeks to request information under subdivision
(a) of this subsection shall certify to the Department of Revenue one
individual who is authorized by such municipality to make such request and
review the documents described in subdivision (a) of this subsection. The
individual may be a municipal employee or an individual who contracts with the
requesting municipality to provide financial, accounting, or other
administrative services.
(c) No individual certified by a municipality pursuant to subdivision (b)
of this subsection shall disclose to any person any information obtained
pursuant to a review under this subsection. An individual certified by a
municipality pursuant to subdivision (b) of this subsection shall remain
subject to this subsection after he or she (i) is no longer certified or (ii)
is no longer in the employment of or under contract with the certifying
municipality.
(d) Any person who violates the provisions of this subsection shall be
guilty of a Class I misdemeanor.
(e) The Department of Revenue shall not be held liable by any person for
an impermissible disclosure by a municipality or any agent or employee thereof
of any information obtained pursuant to a review under this subsection.
(15) In all proceedings under the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967, the Tax
Commissioner may act for and on behalf of the people of the State of Nebraska.
The Tax Commissioner in his or her discretion may waive all or part of any
penalties provided by the provisions of such act or interest on delinquent
taxes specified in section 45-104.02, as such rate may from time to time be
adjusted.
(16)(a) The purpose of this subsection is to set forth the state's policy
for the protection of the confidentiality rights of all participants in the
system operated pursuant to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement and of
the privacy interests of consumers who deal with model 1 sellers.
(b) For purposes of this subsection:
(i) Anonymous data means information that does not identify a person;
(ii) Confidential taxpayer information means all information that is
protected under a member state's laws, regulations, and privileges; and
(iii) Personally identifiable information means information that
identifies a person.
(c) The state agrees that a fundamental precept for model 1 sellers is to
preserve the privacy of consumers by protecting their anonymity. With very
limited exceptions, a certified service provider shall perform its tax
calculation, remittance, and reporting functions without retaining the
personally identifiable information of consumers.
(d) The governing board of the member states in the streamlined sales and
use tax agreement may certify a certified service provider only if that
certified service provider certifies that:
(i) Its system has been designed and tested to ensure that the fundamental
precept of anonymity is respected;
(ii) Personally identifiable information is only used and retained to the
extent necessary for the administration of model 1 with respect to exempt
purchasers;
(iii) It provides consumers clear and conspicuous notice of its
information practices, including what information it collects, how it collects
the information, how it uses the information, how long, if at all, it retains
the information, and whether it discloses the information to member states.
Such notice shall be satisfied by a written privacy policy statement accessible
by the public on the website of the certified service provider;
(iv) Its collection, use, and retention of personally identifiable
information is limited to that required by the member states to ensure the
validity of exemptions from taxation that are claimed by reason of a consumer's
status or the intended use of the goods or services purchased; and
(v) It provides adequate technical, physical, and administrative
safeguards so as to protect personally identifiable information from
unauthorized access and disclosure.
(e) The state shall provide public notification to consumers, including
-6-

LB208 LB208
2025 2025
exempt purchasers, of the state's practices relating to the collection, use,
and retention of personally identifiable information.
(f) When any personally identifiable information that has been collected
and retained is no longer required for the purposes set forth in subdivision
(16)(d)(iv) of this section, such information shall no longer be retained by
the member states.
(g) When personally identifiable information regarding an individual is
retained by or on behalf of the state, it shall provide reasonable access by
such individual to his or her own information in the state's possession and a
right to correct any inaccurately recorded information.
(h) If anyone other than a member state, or a person authorized by that
state's law or the agreement, seeks to discover personally identifiable
information, the state from whom the information is sought should make a
reasonable and timely effort to notify the individual of such request.
(i) This privacy policy is subject to enforcement by the Attorney General.
(j) All other laws and regulations regarding the collection, use, and
maintenance of confidential taxpayer information remain fully applicable and
binding. Without limitation, this subsection does not enlarge or limit the
state's authority to:
(i) Conduct audits or other reviews as provided under the agreement and
state law;
(ii) Provide records pursuant to the federal Freedom of Information Act,
disclosure laws with governmental agencies, or other regulations;
(iii) Prevent, consistent with state law, disclosure of confidential
taxpayer information;
(iv) Prevent, consistent with federal law, disclosure or misuse of federal
return information obtained under a disclosure agreement with the Internal
Revenue Service; and
(v) Collect, disclose, disseminate, or otherwise use anonymous data for
governmental purposes.
Sec. 3. Section 77-2712.03, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-2712.03 (1) The streamlined sales and use tax agreement, as adopted by
the streamlined sales tax implementing states on November 12, 2002, including
amendments through December 31, 2024 2015, is hereby ratified by the
Legislature. The Governor shall enter into the agreement with one or more
states to simplify and modernize sales and use tax administration in order to
substantially reduce the burden of tax compliance for all sellers and for all
types of commerce. In furtherance of the agreement, the Department of Revenue
is authorized to act jointly with other states that are members under Articles
VII or VIII of the agreement to establish standards for certification of a
certified service provider and certified automated system and establish
performance standards for multistate sellers. The department is further
authorized to take other actions permissible under law reasonably required to
implement the provisions set forth in the agreement. Other actions authorized
by this section include, but are not limited to, the adoption and promulgation
of rules and regulations and the joint procurement, with other member states,
of goods and services in furtherance of the agreement.
(2) The Tax Commissioner or his or her designee and two representatives of
the Legislature appointed by the Executive Board of the Legislative Council are
authorized to represent Nebraska before the other member states under the
agreement. The state also agrees to participate in and comply with the
procedures of and decisions made by the governing board of the member states.
These provisions of the agreement include the creation of the organization as
provided in Article VII of the agreement, the requirements for state entry and
withdrawal as provided in Article VIII of the agreement, amendments to the
agreement as provided in Article IX of the agreement, and a dispute resolution
process as provided in Article X of the agreement.
Sec. 4. Section 77-2715.07, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-2715.07 (1) There shall be allowed to qualified resident individuals as
a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967:
(a) A credit equal to the federal credit allowed under section 22 of the
Internal Revenue Code; and
(b) A credit for taxes paid to another state as provided in section
77-2730.
(2) There shall be allowed to qualified resident individuals against the
income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) For returns filed reporting federal adjusted gross incomes of greater
than twenty-nine thousand dollars, a nonrefundable credit equal to twenty-five
percent of the federal credit allowed under section 21 of the Internal Revenue
Code of 1986, as amended, except that for taxable years beginning or deemed to
begin on or after January 1, 2015, such nonrefundable credit shall be allowed
only if the individual would have received the federal credit allowed under
section 21 of the code after adding back in any carryforward of a net operating
loss that was deducted pursuant to such section in determining eligibility for
the federal credit;
(b) For returns filed reporting federal adjusted gross income of twenty-
nine thousand dollars or less, a refundable credit equal to a percentage of the
federal credit allowable under section 21 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended, whether or not the federal credit was limited by the federal tax
liability. The percentage of the federal credit shall be one hundred percent
-7-

LB208 LB208
2025 2025
for incomes not greater than twenty-two thousand dollars, and the percentage
shall be reduced by ten percent for each one thousand dollars, or fraction
thereof, by which the reported federal adjusted gross income exceeds twenty-two
thousand dollars, except that for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on
or after January 1, 2015, such refundable credit shall be allowed only if the
individual would have received the federal credit allowed under section 21 of
the code after adding back in any carryforward of a net operating loss that was
deducted pursuant to such section in determining eligibility for the federal
credit;
(c) A refundable credit as provided in section 77-5209.01 for individuals
who qualify for an income tax credit as a qualified beginning farmer or
livestock producer under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit Act for all taxable
years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2006, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended;
(d) A refundable credit for individuals who qualify for an income tax
credit under the Angel Investment Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage
Microenterprise Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Advantage Research and Development
Act, the Reverse Osmosis System Tax Credit Act, or the Volunteer Emergency
Responders Incentive Act; and
(e) A refundable credit equal to ten percent of the federal credit allowed
under section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, except that
for taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2015,
such refundable credit shall be allowed only if the individual would have
received the federal credit allowed under section 32 of the code after adding
back in any carryforward of a net operating loss that was deducted pursuant to
such section in determining eligibility for the federal credit; and .
(f) A refundable credit as provided in section 77-7203 for individuals who
qualify for an income tax credit under the Child Care Tax Credit Act for all
taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1, 2024, under
the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.
(3) There shall be allowed to all individuals as a nonrefundable credit
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) A credit for personal exemptions allowed under section 77-2716.01;
(b) A credit for contributions to programs or projects certified for tax
credit status as provided in the Creating High Impact Economic Futures Act.
Each partner, each shareholder of an electing subchapter S corporation, each
beneficiary of an estate or trust, or each member of a limited liability
company shall report his or her share of the credit in the same manner and
proportion as he or she reports the partnership, subchapter S corporation,
estate, trust, or limited liability company income;
(c) A credit for investment in a biodiesel facility as provided in section
77-27,236;
(d) A credit as provided in the New Markets Job Growth Investment Act;
(e) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Job Creation and Mainstreet
Revitalization Act;
(f) A credit to employers as provided in sections 77-27,238 and 77-27,240;
(g) A credit as provided in the Affordable Housing Tax Credit Act;
(h) A credit to grocery store retailers, restaurants, and agricultural
producers as provided in section 77-27,241;
(i) A credit as provided in the Sustainable Aviation Fuel Tax Credit Act;
(j) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Shortline Rail Modernization Act;
(k) A credit as provided in the Nebraska Pregnancy Help Act; and
(l) A credit as provided in the Caregiver Tax Credit Act.
(4) There shall be allowed as a credit against the income tax imposed by
the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967:
(a) A credit to all resident estates and trusts for taxes paid to another
state as provided in section 77-2730;
(b) A credit to all estates and trusts for contributions to programs or
projects certified for tax credit status as provided in the Creating High
Impact Economic Futures Act; and
(c) A refundable credit for individuals who qualify for an income tax
credit as an owner of agricultural assets under the Beginning Farmer Tax Credit
Act for all taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2009, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended. The credit allowed
for each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary of a partnership,
corporation, limited liability company, or estate or trust qualifying for an
income tax credit as an owner of agricultural assets under the Beginning Farmer
Tax Credit Act shall be equal to the partner's, shareholder's, member's, or
beneficiary's portion of the amount of tax credit distributed pursuant to
subsection (6) of section 77-5211.
(5)(a) For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2007, and
before January 1, 2009, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended,
there shall be allowed to each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary of
a partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability company, or estate
or trust a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska
Revenue Act of 1967 equal to fifty percent of the partner's, shareholder's,
member's, or beneficiary's portion of the amount of franchise tax paid to the
state under sections 77-3801 to 77-3807 by a financial institution.
(b) For all taxable years beginning on or after January 1, 2009, under the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, there shall be allowed to each
partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary of a partnership, subchapter S
corporation, limited liability company, or estate or trust a nonrefundable
credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 equal
-8-

LB208 LB208
2025 2025
to the partner's, shareholder's, member's, or beneficiary's portion of the
amount of franchise tax paid to the state under sections 77-3801 to 77-3807 by
a financial institution.
(c) Each partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary shall report his or
her share of the credit in the same manner and proportion as he or she reports
the partnership, subchapter S corporation, limited liability company, or estate
or trust income. If any partner, shareholder, member, or beneficiary cannot
fully utilize the credit for that year, the credit may not be carried forward
or back.
(6) There shall be allowed to all individuals nonrefundable credits
against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided
in section 77-3604 and refundable credits against the income tax imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in section 77-3605.
(7)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2020, and before January 1, 2026, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986,
as amended, a nonrefundable credit against the income tax imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 in the amount of five thousand dollars shall be
allowed to any individual who purchases a residence during the taxable year if
such residence:
(i) Is located within an area that has been declared an extremely blighted
area under section 18-2101.02;
(ii) Is the individual's primary residence; and
(iii) Was not purchased from a family member of the individual or a family
member of the individual's spouse.
(b) The credit provided in this subsection shall be claimed for the
taxable year in which the residence is purchased. If the individual cannot
fully utilize the credit for such year, the credit may be carried forward to
subsequent taxable years until fully utilized.
(c) No more than one credit may be claimed under this subsection with
respect to a single residence.
(d) The credit provided in this subsection shall be subject to recapture
by the Department of Revenue if the individual claiming the credit sells or
otherwise transfers the residence or quits using the residence as his or her
primary residence within five years after the end of the taxable year in which
the credit was claimed.
(e) For purposes of this subsection, family member means an individual's
spouse, child, parent, brother, sister, grandchild, or grandparent, whether by
blood, marriage, or adoption.
(8) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits against
the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in the
Cast and Crew Nebraska Act, the Nebraska Biodiesel Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska
Higher Blend Tax Credit Act, the Nebraska Property Tax Incentive Act, the
Relocation Incentive Act, and the Renewable Chemical Production Tax Credit Act.
(9)(a) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January
1, 2022, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a refundable
credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 shall
be allowed to the parent of a stillborn child if:
(i) A fetal death certificate is filed pursuant to subsection (1) of
section 71-606 for such child;
(ii) Such child had advanced to at least the twentieth week of gestation;
and
(iii) Such child would have been a dependent of the individual claiming
the credit.
(b) The amount of the credit shall be two thousand dollars.
(c) The credit shall be allowed for the taxable year in which the
stillbirth occurred.
(10) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits against
the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in
section 77-7203 and nonrefundable credits against the income tax imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in section 77-7204.
(11) There shall be allowed to all individuals refundable credits against
the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in
section 77-3157 and nonrefundable credits against the income tax imposed by the
Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 as provided in sections 77-3156, 77-3158, and
77-3159.
Sec. 5. Section 77-27,143, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
77-27,143 (1) The administration of all sales and use taxes adopted under
the Local Option Revenue Act shall be by the Tax Commissioner who may prescribe
forms and adopt and promulgate reasonable rules and regulations in conformity
with the act for the making of returns and for the ascertainment, assessment,
and collection of taxes imposed under such act. The incorporated municipality
shall furnish a certified copy of the adopting or repealing ordinance to the
Tax Commissioner in accordance with such rules and regulations as he or she may
adopt and promulgate. For ordinances passed after October 1, 1969, the
effective date shall be the first day of the next calendar quarter which is at
least one hundred twenty days following receipt by the Tax Commissioner of the
certified copy of the ordinance. The Tax Commissioner shall provide at least
sixty days' notice of the change in tax to retailers. Notice shall be provided
to retailers within the municipality. Notice to retailers may be provided
through the website of the Department of Revenue or by other electronic means.
(2) For ordinances containing a termination date and passed after October
1, 1986, the termination date shall be the first day of a calendar quarter. The
-9-

LB208 LB208
2025 2025
incorporated municipality shall furnish a certified statement to the Tax
Commissioner no more than one hundred eighty days and at least one hundred
twenty days prior to the termination date that the termination date stated in
the ordinance is still valid. If the certified statement is not furnished
within the prescribed time, the tax shall remain in effect, and the Tax
Commissioner shall continue to collect the tax until the first day of the
calendar quarter which is at least one hundred twenty days after receipt of the
certified statement notwithstanding the termination date stated in the
ordinance. The Tax Commissioner shall provide at least sixty days' notice of
the termination of the tax to retailers. Notice shall be provided to retailers
within the municipality. Notice to retailers may be provided through the
website of the department or by other electronic means.
(3) For sales and use tax purposes only, local jurisdiction boundary
changes apply only on the first day of a calendar quarter after a minimum of
one hundred twenty days' notice to the Tax Commissioner and sixty days' notice
to sellers.
(4) The state shall provide and maintain a database that describes
boundary changes for all local taxing jurisdictions. This database shall
include a description of any change and the effective date of the change for
sales and use tax purposes.
(5) The state shall provide and maintain a database of all sales and use
tax rates for all of the local jurisdictions levying taxes within the state.
For the identification of counties, cities, and villages, codes corresponding
to the rates shall be provided according to Federal Information Processing
Standards as developed by the National Institute of Standards and Technology.
(6) The state shall provide and maintain a database that assigns each
five-digit and nine-digit zip code within the state to the proper tax rates and
jurisdictions. For purposes of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, the
database shall apply the lowest combined tax rate imposed in the nine-digit zip
code area if the area includes more than one tax rate in any level of taxing
jurisdictions, and the database shall apply the highest combined tax rate
imposed in the five-digit zip code area if the area includes more than one tax
rate in any level of taxing jurisdictions. If a nine-digit zip code designation
is not available for a street address or if a seller is unable to determine the
nine-digit zip code designation applicable to a purchase after exercising due
diligence to determine the designation, the seller or certified service
provider may apply the rate for the five-digit zip code area. For purposes of
this section, there is a rebuttable presumption that a seller or certified
service provider has exercised due diligence if the seller has attempted to
determine the nine-digit zip code designation by utilizing software approved by
the governing board that makes this designation from the street address and the
five-digit zip code applicable to a purchase.
(7) For purposes of the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, the state
may provide address-based boundary database records for assigning taxing
jurisdictions and their associated rates which shall be in addition to the
requirements of subsection (6) of this section. The database records shall be
in the same approved format as the database records pursuant to subsection (6)
of this section and shall meet the requirements developed pursuant to the
federal Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C. 119(a), as such act
existed on January 1, 2003. The governing board may allow a member state to
require sellers that register under the agreement to use an address-based
boundary database provided by that member state. If any member state develops
an address-based boundary database pursuant to the agreement, a seller or
certified service provider may use those database records in place of the five-
digit and nine-digit zip code database records provided for in subsection (6)
of this section. If a seller or certified service provider is unable to
determine the applicable rate and jurisdiction using an address-based boundary
database after exercising due diligence, the seller or certified service
provider may apply the nine-digit zip code designation applicable to a
purchase. If a nine-digit zip code designation is not available for a street
address or if a seller or certified service provider is unable to determine the
nine-digit zip code designation applicable to a purchase after exercising due
diligence to determine the designation, the seller or certified service
provider may apply the rate for the five-digit zip code area. For the purposes
of this section, there is a rebuttable presumption that a seller or certified
service provider has exercised due diligence if the seller or certified service
provider has attempted to determine the tax rate and jurisdiction by utilizing
software approved by the governing board that makes this assignment from the
address and zip code information applicable to the purchase.
(8) The state may certify vendor-provided address-based boundary databases
for assigning tax rates and jurisdictions. The databases shall be in the same
approved format as the database records pursuant to subsection (7) of this
section and shall meet the requirements developed pursuant to the federal
Mobile Telecommunications Sourcing Act, 4 U.S.C. 119(a) as such act existed on
January 1, 2003. If a state certifies a vendor-provided address-based boundary
database, a seller or certified service provider may use that database in place
of the database provided for in subsection (6) or (7) of this section. Vendors
providing address-based boundary databases may request certification of their
databases from the governing board. Certification by the governing board does
not replace the requirement that the databases be certified by the states
individually.
(9) Pursuant to the streamlined sales and use tax agreement, the state
shall relieve retailers and certified service providers using databases
-10-

LB208 LB208
2025 2025
pursuant to subsection (6) or (7) of this section from liability to the state
and local jurisdictions for having charged and collected the incorrect amount
of sales or use tax resulting from the retailer or certified service provider
relying on erroneous data provided by a member state on tax rates, boundaries,
or taxing jurisdiction assignments. After providing adequate notice determined
by the governing board, a member state that provides an address-based boundary
database for assigning taxing jurisdictions pursuant to subsection (7) or (8)
of this section may cease providing liability relief for errors resulting from
the reliance on the database provided by the member state under the provisions
of subsection (6) of this section. If a seller demonstrates that requiring the
use of the address-based boundary database would create an undue hardship, the
state and the governing board may extend the relief of liability to such seller
for a designated period of time.
(10) The databases provided for in this section shall be in a downloadable
format approved by the governing board pursuant to the streamlined sales and
use tax agreement. The databases may be directly provided by the state or
provided by a vendor as designated by the state. A database provided by a
vendor as designated by a state shall be applicable to and subject to all
provisions of this section. The databases shall be provided at no cost to the
user of the database. The provisions of subsections (6) and (7) of this section
do not apply when the purchased product is received by the purchaser at the
business location of the seller.
(11) A seller that did not have a requirement to register in this state
prior to registering pursuant to the agreement or a certified service provider
shall not be required to collect sales or use taxes for a state until the first
day of the calendar quarter commencing more than sixty days after the state has
provided the databases required by this section.
Sec. 6. Section 77-27,241, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
77-27,241 (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Agricultural producer means an individual or entity whose income is
primarily attributable to crop or livestock production in the State of
Nebraska;
(b) Department means the Department of Revenue;
(c) Food bank means an organization in this state that:
(i) Is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(ii) Distributes food in ten or more counties in Nebraska and qualifies
for the Emergency Food Assistance Program administered by the United States
Department of Agriculture;
(d) Food pantry means an organization in this state that:
(i) Is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(ii) Distributes emergency food supplies to low-income individuals in this
state who would otherwise not have access to such food supplies;
(e) Food rescue means an organization in this state that:
(i) Is exempt from federal income taxation under section 501(c)(3) of the
Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; and
(ii) Accepts donations of food and delivers such food to food banks or
food pantries so that such food may be distributed to low-income individuals in
this state;
(f) Grocery store retailer means a retailer located in this state that is
primarily engaged in business activities classified as code 445110 under the
North American Industry Classification System;
(g) Qualifying agricultural food donation means a donation made by an
agricultural producer to a food bank, food pantry, or food rescue of fresh or
frozen fruits, vegetables, eggs, dairy products, or meat products grown or
produced in the State of Nebraska which meets all applicable quality and
labeling standards, along with any other applicable requirements of the food
bank, food pantry, or food rescue to which the qualifying agricultural food
donation is made; and
(h) Restaurant means a business located in this state that is primarily
engaged in business activities classified as code 722511, 722513, 722514, or
722515 under the North American Industry Classification System.
(2) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after January 1,
2025, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a credit against the
income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 shall be allowed to:
(a) Any grocery store retailer or restaurant that donates food to a food
bank, food pantry, or food rescue during the taxable year; and
(b) Any agricultural producer that makes a qualifying agricultural food
donation to a food bank, food pantry, or food rescue during the taxable year.
(3) Subject to subsection (7) of this section, the credit provided in this
section shall be a nonrefundable credit in an amount equal to fifty percent of
the value of the food donations or qualifying agricultural food donations made
during the taxable year, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars. Any
amount of the credit that the taxpayer is prohibited from claiming in a taxable
year may be carried forward to any of the three subsequent taxable years.
(4) For purposes of this section, food donated by a grocery store retailer
or restaurant shall be valued at its wholesale value. A qualifying agricultural
food donation shall be valued at the prevailing market value of the product at
the time of donation, plus the direct cost incurred by the agricultural
producer for processing the product.
(5) To receive a credit under this section, a taxpayer shall submit an
-11-

LB208 LB208
2025 2025
application to the department in a form and manner prescribed by the
department. The application shall include the amount of food donated during the
taxable year and any other information required by the department.
(6) If the department determines that an application is complete and that
the taxpayer qualifies for credits, the department shall approve the
application within the limits set forth in this section and shall certify the
amount of credits approved to the taxpayer.
(7) The department may approve up to five hundred thousand dollars of
credits in fiscal year 2025-26 and each fiscal year thereafter. Once credits
have reached the annual limit for any fiscal year, no additional credits shall
be allowed for such fiscal year. Credits shall be prorated among the credit
requests received on the day the annual limit is exceeded. If the amount of
credits requested by qualified taxpayers in any year exceeds such limit, the
department shall allocate credits proportionally based on the amounts requested
so that the limit is not exceeded.
(8) A taxpayer shall claim the credit by attaching the tax credit
certification received from the department under subsection (6) of this section
to the taxpayer's tax return.
(9) Any amount relating to such food donations or qualifying agricultural
food donations that was deducted as a charitable contribution on the taxpayer's
federal income tax return must be added back in the determination of Nebraska
taxable income before the credit provided in this section may be claimed.
(10) No credit granted under this section shall be transferred, sold, or
assigned. No taxpayer shall be eligible to receive a credit under this section
if such taxpayer employs persons who are not authorized to work in the United
States under federal law. No taxpayer shall be able to claim more than one
credit under this section for a single donation.
(11) A food bank, food pantry, or food rescue may accept or reject any
food donated under this section for any reason. Any food that is rejected shall
not qualify for a credit under this section.
(12) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
Sec. 7. Section 77-7012, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-7012 (1) If the department determines that an application is complete
and that the taxpayer qualifies for tax credits, the department shall approve
the application within the limits set forth in this section and shall certify
the amount of tax credits approved to the taxpayer.
(2) The department may approve up to one million dollars in tax credits in
fiscal year 2024-25 and up to one million five hundred thousand dollars in tax
credits in any fiscal year thereafter. Once credits have reached the annual
limit for any fiscal year, no additional credits shall be allowed for such
fiscal year. Credits shall be prorated among the credit requests received on
the day the annual limit is exceeded. If the total amount of tax credits
requested in any fiscal year exceeds such limit, the department shall allocate
the tax credits proportionally based upon amounts requested.
Sec. 8. Section 77-7203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, is
amended to read:
77-7203 (1) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2024, under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, a parent
or legal guardian who is a resident of the State of Nebraska shall be eligible
to receive a credit against the income tax imposed by the Nebraska Revenue Act
of 1967 if:
(a) The parent's or legal guardian's child is enrolled in a child care
program licensed pursuant to the Child Care Licensing Act;
(b) The parent's or legal guardian's child receives care from an approved
license-exempt provider enrolled in the child care subsidy program pursuant to
sections 68-1202 and 68-1206; or
(c) The parent's or legal guardian's total household income is less than
or equal to one hundred percent of the federal poverty level.
(2) The credit provided in this section shall be a refundable tax credit
equal to:
(a) Two thousand dollars per child if the parent's or legal guardian's
total household income is no more than seventy-five thousand dollars; or
(b) One thousand dollars per child if the parent's or legal guardian's
total household income is more than seventy-five thousand dollars but no more
than one hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(3) A parent or legal guardian shall not be eligible for a credit under
this section if the parent's or legal guardian's total household income is more
than one hundred fifty thousand dollars.
(4) A parent or legal guardian shall apply for the credit provided in this
section by submitting an application to the department with the following
information:
(a) The number of children for which the parent or legal guardian is
claiming a credit;
(b) Documentation of the parent's or legal guardian's total household
income; and
(c) Any other documentation required by the department.
(5) Subject to subsection (6) of this section, if the department
determines that the parent or legal guardian qualifies for tax credits under
this section, the department shall approve the application and certify the
amount of credits approved to the parent or legal guardian.
(6) The department shall consider applications in the order in which they
-12-

LB208 LB208
2025 2025
are received and may approve tax credits under this section each year until the
total amount of credits approved for the year equals fifteen million dollars.
Sec. 9. Original sections 77-2712.03 and 77-27,143, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, and sections 77-2708, 77-2711, 77-2715.07, 77-27,241,
77-7012, and 77-7203, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024, are
repealed.
-13-